Utah statutes.
59-12-211.   Definitions -- Location of certain transactions -- Reports to
commission -- Direct payment provision for a seller making certain purchases
-- Exceptions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "Receipt" and "receive" mean:
(A)  taking possession of tangible personal property;
(B)  making first use of a service; or
(C)  for a product transferred electronically, the earlier of:
(I)  taking possession of the product transferred electronically; or
(II)  making first use of the product transferred electronically.
(ii)  "Receipt" and "receive" do not include possession by a shipping company
on behalf of a purchaser.
(b)  "Transportation equipment" means:
(i)  a locomotive or rail car that is used to carry a person or property in
interstate commerce;
(ii)  a truck or truck-tractor:
(A)  with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 pounds or more;
(B)  registered under Section 41-1a-301; and
(C)  operated under the authority of a carrier authorized and certificated:
(I)  by the United States Department of Transportation or another federal
authority; and
(II)  to engage in carrying a person or property in interstate commerce;
(iii)  a trailer, semitrailer, or passenger bus that is:
(A)  registered under Section 41-1a-301; and
(B)  operated under the authority of a carrier authorized and certificated:
(I)  by the United States Department of Transportation or another federal
authority; and
(II)  to engage in carrying a person or property in interstate commerce;
(iv)  an aircraft that is operated by an air carrier authorized and
certificated:
(A)  by the United States Department of Transportation or another federal or
foreign authority; and
(B)  to engage in carrying a person or property in interstate commerce; or
(v)  a container designed for use on, or a component part attached or secured
on, an item of equipment listed in Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (iv).
(2)  Except as provided in Subsections (8) and (13), if tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or a service that is subject
to taxation under this chapter is received by a purchaser at a business
location of a seller, the location of the transaction is the business location
of the seller.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (10), and except as provided in Subsections (7),
(8), (9), (11), and (13), if tangible personal property, a product transferred
electronically, or a service that is subject to taxation under this chapter is
not received by a purchaser at a business location of a seller, the location
of the transaction is the location where the purchaser takes receipt of the
tangible personal property or service.
(4)  Subject to Subsection (10), and except as provided in Subsections (7),
(8), (9), (11), and (13), if Subsection (2) or (3) does not apply, the
location of the transaction is the location indicated by an address for or
other information on the purchaser if:
(a)  the address or other information is available from the seller's business
records; and
(b)  use of the address or other information from the seller's records does
not constitute bad faith.
(5) (a)  Subject to Subsection (10), and except as provided in Subsections
(7), (8), (9), (11), and (13), if Subsection (2), (3), or (4) does not apply,
the location of the transaction is the location indicated by an address for
the purchaser if:
(i)  the address is obtained during the consummation of the transaction; and
(ii)  use of the address described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) does not constitute
bad faith.
(b)  An address used under Subsection (5)(a) includes the address of a
purchaser's payment instrument if no other address is available.
(6)  Subject to Subsection (10), and except as provided in Subsections (7),
(8), (9), (11), and (13), if Subsection (2), (3), (4), or (5) does not apply
or if a seller does not have sufficient information to apply Subsection (2),
(3), (4), or (5), the location of the transaction is the location:
(a)  indicated by the address from which:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (6)(a)(ii), for tangible personal
property that is subject to taxation under this chapter, the tangible personal
property is shipped;
(ii)  for computer software delivered electronically or for a product
transferred electronically that is subject to taxation under this chapter, the
computer software or product transferred electronically is first available for
transmission by the seller; or
(iii)  for a service that is subject to taxation under this chapter, the
service is provided; or
(b)  as determined by the seller with respect to a prepaid wireless calling
service:
(i)  provided in Subsection (6)(a)(iii); or
(ii)  associated with the mobile telephone number.
(7) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (7), "shared ZIP Code" means a nine-
digit ZIP Code that is located within two or more local taxing jurisdictions.
(b)  If the location of a transaction determined under Subsections (3) through
(6) is in a shared ZIP Code, the location of the transaction is:
(i)  if there is only one local taxing jurisdiction that imposes the lowest
agreement combined tax rate for the shared ZIP Code, the local taxing
jurisdiction that imposes the lowest agreement combined tax rate; or
(ii)  if two or more local taxing jurisdictions impose the lowest agreement
combined tax rate for the shared ZIP Code, the local taxing jurisdiction that:
(A)  imposes the lowest agreement combined tax rate for the shared ZIP Code;
and
(B)  has located within the local taxing jurisdiction the largest number of
street addresses within the shared ZIP Code.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision under this chapter authorizing or requiring
the imposition of a sales and use tax, for purposes of Subsection (7)(b), a
seller shall collect a sales and use tax imposed under this chapter at the
lowest agreement combined tax rate imposed within the local taxing
jurisdiction in which the transaction is located under Subsection (7)(b).
(d)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules:
(i)  providing for the circumstances under which a seller has exercised due
diligence in determining the nine-digit ZIP Code for an address; or
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (7)(b), for determining the local taxing
jurisdiction within which a transaction is located if a seller is unable to
determine the local taxing jurisdiction within which the transaction is
located under Subsection (7)(b).
(8)  The location of a transaction made with a direct payment permit described
in Section 59-12-107.1 is the location where receipt of the tangible personal
property, product, or service by the purchaser occurs.
(9)  The location of a purchase of direct mail is the location determined in
accordance with Section 59-12-123.
(10) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (10)(b), the location of a
transaction determined under Subsections (3) through (6), (8), or (9), is the
local taxing jurisdiction within which:
(i)  the nine-digit ZIP Code assigned to the location determined under
Subsections (3) through (6), (8), or (9) is located; or
(ii)  the five-digit ZIP Code assigned to the location determined under
Subsections (3) through (6), (8), or (9) is located if:
(A)  a nine-digit ZIP Code is not available for the location determined under
Subsections (3) through (6), (8), or (9); or
(B)  after exercising due diligence, a seller or certified service provider is
unable to determine a nine-digit ZIP Code for the location determined under
Subsections (3) through (6), (8), or (9).
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules for determining the local taxing
jurisdiction within which a transaction is located if a seller or certified
service provider is unable to determine the local taxing jurisdiction within
which the transaction is located under Subsection (10)(a).
(11) (a)  As used in this Subsection (11), "florist delivery transaction"
means a transaction commenced by a florist that transmits an order:
(i)  by:
(A)  telegraph;
(B)  telephone; or
(C)  a means of communication similar to Subsection (11)(a)(i)(A) or (B); and
(ii)  for delivery to another place:
(A)  in this state; or
(B)  outside this state.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsections (3) through (6), beginning on January 1,
2009, and ending on December 31, 2009, the location of a florist delivery
transaction is the business location of the florist that commences the florist
delivery transaction.
(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule:
(i)  define:
(A)  "business location"; and
(B)  "florist";
(ii)  define what constitutes a means of communication similar to Subsection
(11)(a)(i)(A) or (B); and
(iii)  provide procedures for determining when a transaction is commenced.
(12) (a)  A tax collected under this chapter shall be reported to the
commission on a form that identifies the location of each transaction that
occurs during the return filing period.
(b)  The form described in Subsection (12)(a) shall be filed with the
commission as required under this chapter.
(13)  This section does not apply to:
(a)  amounts charged by a seller for:
(i)  telecommunications service except for a prepaid calling service or a
prepaid wireless calling service as provided in Subsection (6)(b) or Section
59-12-215; or
(ii)  the retail sale or transfer of:
(A)  a motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle that is transportation
equipment;
(B)  an aircraft other than an aircraft that is transportation equipment;
(C)  a watercraft;
(D)  a modular home;
(E)  a manufactured home; or
(F)  a mobile home; or
(iii)  except as provided in Section 59-12-214, the lease or rental of
tangible personal property other than tangible personal property that is
transportation equipment;
(b)  a tax a person pays in accordance with Subsection 59-12-107(1)(d); or
(c)  a retail sale of tangible personal property or a product transferred
electronically if:
(i)  the seller receives the order for the tangible personal property or
product transferred electronically in this state;
(ii)  receipt of the tangible personal property or product transferred
electronically by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee occurs in this state;
(iii)  the location where receipt of the tangible personal property or product
transferred electronically by the purchaser occurs is determined in accordance
with Subsections (3) through (5); and
(iv)  at the time the seller receives the order, the record keeping system
that the seller uses to calculate the proper amount of tax imposed under this
chapter captures the location where the order is received.
